Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2619YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 674 Section 1. Section 70A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. a. An employee of the state may be 3 granted leave with pay from work for not more than sixteen 4 hours in a calendar year to participate in volunteer activities 5 without loss of seniority, pay, vacation time, personal days, 6 sick leave, insurance and health coverage benefits, or earned 7 overtime accumulation. An employee granted leave under this 8 subsection shall be compensated at the employeeâs regular rate 9 of pay for those regular work hours during which the employee 10 is absent from work. 11 b. An employee granted leave under this subsection shall 12 not be deemed to be an employee of the state for purposes of 13 workersâ compensation during the period of leave. An employee 14 granted leave under this subsection shall not be deemed to be 15 an employee of the state for purposes of chapter 669 during the 16 period of leave. 17